Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.474

Liquidation—Disposition of unclaimed funds.

(1) At a special meeting called for the purpose of liquidation, and upon the recommendation of at least two-thirds of the total members of the board of a credit union, the members of a credit union may elect to liquidate the credit union by a two-thirds majority vote of those members voting.

(2) Upon a vote to liquidate under subsection (1) of this section, a three-person liquidating committee must be elected to liquidate the assets of the credit union. The committee shall act in accordance with any requirements of the director and may be reasonably compensated by the board of the credit union. Each share account holder and depositor at the credit union is entitled to his, her, or its proportionate part of the assets in liquidation after all shares, deposits, and debts have been paid. The proportionate allocation shall be based on account balances as of a date determined by the board. For the purposes of liquidation, shares and deposits are equivalent. The assets of the liquidating credit union are not subject to contingent liabilities. Upon distribution of the assets, the credit union ceases to exist except for the purpose of discharging existing liabilities and obligations.

(3) Funds representing unclaimed dividends in liquidation and remaining in the hands of the liquidating committee for six months after the date of the final dividend must be deposited, together with all the books and papers of the credit union, with the director. The director may, one year after receipt, destroy such records, books, and papers as, in the director's judgment, are obsolete or unnecessary for future reference. The funds may be deposited in one or more financial institutions to the credit of the director, in trust for the members of the credit union entitled to the funds. The director may pay a portion of the funds to a person upon receipt of satisfactory evidence that the person is entitled to the funds. In case of doubt or conflicting claims, the director may require an order of the superior court of the county in which the principal place of business of the credit union was located, authorizing and directing the payment of the funds. The director may apply the interest earned by the funds toward defraying the expenses incurred in the holding and paying of the funds. Five years after the receipt of the funds, the funds still remaining with the director must be remitted to the state as unclaimed property.

[ 2001 c 83 s 25; 1997 c 397 s 44; 1994 c 92 s 223; 1984 c 31 s 74. Formerly RCW 31.12.725.]

NOTES:

Revised uniform unclaimed property act: Chapter 63.30 RCW.